Hawaii statutes.
[§431R-3] Prescription drugs; beneficiary
choice; mail order opt out. (a) If a retail community pharmacy enters
into a contractual retail pharmacy network agreement pursuant to section 431R-2,
a prescription drug benefit plan, health
benefits plan under chapter 87A, or
pharmacy benefit manager shall permit each beneficiary, at the beneficiary's
option, to fill any covered prescription that may be obtained by mail order at
any retail community pharmacy of the beneficiary's choice within the pharmacy
benefit manager's retail pharmacy network.

(b) A prescription drug benefit plan, health benefits plan under chapter 87A, or pharmacy benefit manager who
has entered into a contractual retail pharmacy network agreement with a retail
community pharmacy shall not:

(1) Require a beneficiary to exclusively obtain any
prescription from a mail order pharmacy;

(2) Impose upon a beneficiary utilizing the retail
community pharmacy a copayment, fee, or other condition not imposed upon
beneficiaries electing to utilize a mail order pharmacy;

(3) Subject any prescription dispensed by a retail
community pharmacy to a beneficiary to a minimum or maximum quantity limit,
length of script, restriction on refills, or requirement to obtain refills not imposed
upon a mail order pharmacy;

(4) Require a beneficiary in whole or in part to pay
for any prescription dispensed by a retail community pharmacy and seek
reimbursement if the beneficiary is not required to pay for and seek
reimbursement in the same manner for a prescription dispensed by a mail order
pharmacy;

(5) Subject a beneficiary to any administrative
requirement to use a retail community pharmacy that is not imposed upon the use
of a mail order pharmacy; or

(6) Impose any other term, condition, or requirement
pertaining to the use of the services of a retail community pharmacy that
materially and unreasonably interferes with or impairs the right of a
beneficiary to obtain prescriptions from a retail community pharmacy of the
beneficiary's choice. [L 2013, c 226, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next